Hawaii statutes.
§606-2 Temporary assistants. In case
of the temporary absence or disability of any clerk, or when the business of
any court demands, an assistant clerk, having the powers of a clerk, may be
appointed for temporary duty. The salary of the assistant may be paid out of
any appropriation available for the expenses of the court. [L 1892, c 57, §67;
am L 1911, c 84, §2; RL 1925, §2292; am L 1929, c 14, §1; RL 1935, §3691; RL
1945, §9722; am L 1949, c 33, §1; am L 1951, c 192, §1; RL 1955, §218-2; HRS
§606-2; am L 1972, c 88, §4(b)]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next